Massachusetts, session 194th, H3858.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any special or general law, rule or regulation to the contrary, any
Massachusetts resident who is a 100 percent disabled veteran shall be entitled to any hunting or
fishing license offered by the Commonwealth without fee or cost.
of 1